test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-avtorutsjka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - авторучка: # Noun 'fountain pen'

    авторучка+N+Sg+Nom: авторучка
    авторучка+N+Sg+Gen: авторучкан
    авторучка+N+Sg+Dat: авторучкалан
    авторучка+N+Sg+Acc: авторучкам
    авторучка+N+Sg+Cmpr: авторучкала
    авторучка+N+Sg+Com: авторучкаге
    авторучка+N+Sg+Ine: авторучкаште
    авторучка+N+Sg+Ill: [авторучкашке, авторучкаш]
    авторучка+N+Sg+Lat: авторучкаш
    авторучка+N+Sg+Abe: авторучкаде
    авторучка+N+Pl+Nom: [авторучка-шамыч, авторучка-влак]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Gen: [авторучка-шамычын, авторучка-влакын]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Dat: [авторучка-шамычлан, авторучка-влаклан]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Acc: [авторучка-шамычым, авторучка-влакым]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Cmpr: [авторучка-шамычла, авторучка-влакла]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Com: [авторучка-шамычге, авторучка-влакге]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Ine: [авторучка-шамычыште, авторучка-влакыште]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Ill: [авторучка-шамычышке, авторучка-влакышке, авторучка-шамычыш, авторучка-влакыш]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Lat: [авторучка-шамычеш, авторучка-влакеш]
    авторучка+N+Pl+Abe: [авторучка-шамычде, авторучка-влакде]

     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/Poss: авторучкамже
     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/Poss: авторучкатше
     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/Poss: авторучкажыже
     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Foc/Poss: авторучканаже
     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Foc/Poss: авторучкадаже
     авторучка+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Foc/Poss: авторучкаштше
